Wyoming, session 2025, HB0264.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-14-601 is created to read:
ARTICLE 6
CENTRAL BANK DIGITAL CURRENCY PROHIBITION
9-14-601. Central bank digital currency; prohibition;
definitions.
(a) No state agency shall require payment in the form
of a central bank digital currency for any government
service, or for the payment of any taxes or fees.
(b) No state agency shall use public funds to assist
in any manner in the testing, adoption or implementation of
a central bank digital currency.
(c) As used in this article:
(i) "Central bank digital currency" means a
digital medium of exchange, token or monetary unit of
account issued directly by the United States federal
reserve system or any analogous federal agency;
(ii) "State agency" means the state of Wyoming
or any of its branches, agencies, departments, boards,
instrumentalities or institutions.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0264
ENROLLED ACT NO. 25, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2